Hawaii statutes.
[§11-434] Post-election examination
and audit; return of funds. (a) The commission shall examine and audit
the public funds received by all candidates, qualifying contributions, and the
expenditures made by all candidates within sixty days after each general
election.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules, pursuant
to chapter 91, prior to the payment of public money, regarding expenditures
which qualify under section 11-432.

(c) If the commission determines that any
payment of public funds to a candidate exceeded the aggregate amount to which
the candidate was entitled, the commission shall notify the candidate within
two years of the payment of the public funds and the candidate shall repay the
excess amount to the Hawaii election campaign fund.

(d) If the commission determines that any
public funds were used for any improper purpose, the commission shall notify
the candidate, and the candidate shall pay to the Hawaii election campaign fund
an amount equal to three hundred per cent of such amount in addition to any
fines under section 11-410 and section 11-412. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next